trunk/incubator/apertium-sh-sl.sl.dix
    <pardef n="kli/cati__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cati</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čem</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>češ</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>če</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čeva</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>četa</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>četa</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čemo</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čete</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čejo</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cal</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>calo</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cal</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>calo</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cal</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>calo</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cali</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cali</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cali</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cali</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cale</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cali</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cale</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cali</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cale</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cala</l>
          <r>cati<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="klicati"><i>kli</i><par n="kli/cati__vblex"/></e>
